Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB293.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 148.021 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Parks shall exercise all administrative functions of the state
relating to the operation of state parks, shrines, monuments, and museums except
those allocated to the historical society.
(2) The department may request acquisition, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapters
42, 45, 45A, 56, and the provisions made in this chapter, of lands by purchase,
lease, or otherwise, on which to operate state parks.
(3) The department may improve said parks by constructing and equipping
improvements or facilities in said parks.
(4) The department may operate said parks, fix fees and charges for the use of said
parks and the improvements and facilities constructed therein, and provide for the
collection of said fees and charges and the proper accounting therefor, except that:
(a) The department shall not impose boat launching fees at any boat ramp over
which it has authority and control;[ and]
(b) The department shall not allow, grant permission to, or permit any individual,
sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or
other form of business arrangement to which the department has granted a
rental or leasehold interest or has engaged to manage or operate facilities that
include a public boat launching ramp, to charge a boat launching fee at any
boat ramp; and
(c) The department shall offer each resident of Kentucky a discount of fifteen
percent (15%), excluding taxes and fees, on all lodging rates, golf passes,
and golf rates. To claim the discount provided for in this paragraph, a
Kentucky resident shall present a Kentucky driver's license or other state-
issued form of identification. At state park lodging resorts, proof of
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/24/2025 2:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1011
residency shall be presented upon check-in. At state park resort golf
courses, proof of residency shall be presented at the time of purchase.
(5) The Department of Parks is authorized to enter into any agreement with the Breaks
Interstate Park Commission for the operation of any facilities in the Breaks
Interstate Park.
(6) The Department of Parks is authorized to accept, for deposit in a trust and agency
fund account in accordance with KRS 45.253, on behalf of the state any grant or
contribution, federal or otherwise, to assist in meeting the cost of carrying out the
functions assigned to the Department of Parks.
(7) Notwithstanding any provision in KRS Chapter 41, 45, 45A, or 47 to the contrary,
there may be established separate cash funds and depositories at each state park
from which immediate payment of refunds may be made to a patron or guest of
such state park of any unearned money advanced or paid by such guest or patron.
The department may accept from a guest or patron an amount which includes the
fee for the service rendered plus a gratuity for the waitress or other designated
person and remit the gratuity directly from the depository or cash fund to the
designated recipient thereof. Such funds or depositories shall be governed by
regulations established by the Department of Parks and approved by the Finance
and Administration Cabinet.
(8) The commissioner may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
provisions of KRS Chapter 13A in order to carry out the provisions of this section.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as the J.E. Jones Kentucky Fairways Act.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/24/2025 2:45 PM Jacketed